test/src/morphology/N-sammal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sammal: # nouns 'moss / sammal' - full paradigm
     sammal+N+Sg+Nom: sammal
     sammal+N+Sg+Gen: sammalen
     sammal+N+Sg+Acc: [sammal, sammalen]
     sammal+N+Sg+Par: sammaldu
     sammal+N+Sg+Tra: sammalekse
     sammal+N+Sg+Abe: [sammalettah, sammaleta]
     sammal+N+Sg+Com: sammalenke
     sammal+N+Sg+Ine: sammales
     sammal+N+Sg+Ela: [sammalespäi, sammales]
     sammal+N+Sg+Ill: sammaleh
     sammal+N+Sg+Ade: sammalel
     sammal+N+Sg+Abl: [sammalelpäi, sammalel]
     sammal+N+Sg+All: sammalele
     sammal+N+Sg+Ess: sammalennu
     sammal+N+Sg+Ter: sammalessah
     sammal+N+Sg+Apr: sammalelluo
     sammal+N+Pl+Nom: sammalet
     sammal+N+Pl+Gen: sammalien
     sammal+N+Pl+Acc: sammalet
     sammal+N+Pl+Par: sammalii
     sammal+N+Pl+Tra: sammalikse
     sammal+N+Pl+Abe: [sammalittah, sammalita]
     sammal+N+Pl+Com: sammalienke
     sammal+N+Pl+Ine: sammalis
     sammal+N+Pl+Ela: [sammalispäi, sammalis]
     sammal+N+Pl+Ill: sammalih
     sammal+N+Pl+Ade: sammalil
     sammal+N+Pl+Abl: [sammalilpäi, sammalil]
     sammal+N+Pl+All: sammalile
     sammal+N+Pl+Ess: sammalinnu
     sammal+N+Pl+Ins: sammalin
     sammal+N+Pl+Apr: sammalielluo
     sammal+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: sammalgi
     sammal+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: sammalengi
     sammal+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [sammalgi, sammalengi]
     sammal+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: sammaldugi
     sammal+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: sammaleksegi
     sammal+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [sammalettahgi, sammaletagi]
     sammal+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: sammalenkegi
     sammal+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: sammalesgi
     sammal+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [sammalespäigi, sammalesgi]
     sammal+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: sammalehgi
     sammal+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: sammalelgi
     sammal+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [sammalelpäigi, sammalelgi]
     sammal+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: sammalelegi
     sammal+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: sammalennugi
     sammal+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: sammalessahgi
     sammal+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: sammalelluogi
     sammal+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: sammaletgi
     sammal+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: sammaliengi
     sammal+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: sammaletgi
     sammal+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: sammaliigi
     sammal+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: sammaliksegi
     sammal+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [sammalittahgi, sammalitagi]
     sammal+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: sammalienkegi
     sammal+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: sammalisgi
     sammal+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [sammalispäigi, sammalisgi]
     sammal+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: sammalihgi
     sammal+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: sammalilgi
     sammal+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [sammalilpäigi, sammalilgi]
     sammal+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: sammalilegi
     sammal+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: sammalinnugi
     sammal+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: sammalingi
     sammal+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: sammalielluogi
